Maryland, session 2026, HB0137.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
9–109.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “CUSTODY EVALUATOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL
APPOINTED OR APPROVED BY A COURT TO CONDUCT A CUSTODY EVALUATION.
(B) ON MOTION OF A PARTY OR CHILD’S COUNSEL, OR ON ITS OWN
INITIATIVE, A COURT MAY:
(1) ORDER AN ASSESSMENT TO AID THE COURT IN EVALUATING THE
HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE OR BEST INTERESTS OF A CHILD IN A CONTESTED
CUSTODY OR VISITATION CASE; OR
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0137*

HOUSE BILL 137
(2) APPOINT A CUSTODY EVALUATOR DETERMINED BY THE COURT TO
BE COMPETENT TO CONDUCT A HOME STUDY OR AN EVALUATION OF A SPECIFIC
ISSUE.
(C) A COURT MAY NOT ORDER THE COST OF AN ASSESSMENT TO BE PAID, IN
WHOLE OR IN PART, BY A PARTY WITHOUT GIVING THE PARTIES NOTICE AND AN
OPPORTUNITY TO OBJECT.
(D) A COURT MAY NOT APPOINT AN INDIVIDUAL AS A CUSTODY EVALUATOR
UNLESS:
(1) THE INDIVIDUAL MEETS THE QUALIFICATIONS SPECIFIED IN
SUBSECTIONS (E) AND (F) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) THE COURT WAIVES THE QUALIFICATIONS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION.
(E) (1) A CUSTODY EVALUATOR MUST BE:
(I) A PHYSICIAN LICENSED IN ANY STATE WHO IS
BOARD–CERTIFIED IN PSYCHIATRY OR HAS COMPLETED A PSYCHIATRY RESIDENCY
ACCREDITED BY THE ACCREDITATION COUNCIL FOR GRADUATE MEDICAL
EDUCATION OR A SUCCESSOR TO THAT COUNCIL;
(II) A MARYLAND–LICENSED PSYCHOLOGIST OR A
PSYCHOLOGIST WITH AN EQUIVALENT LEVEL OF LICENSURE IN ANY OTHER STATE;
(III) A MARYLAND–LICENSED CLINICAL MARRIAGE AND FAMILY
THERAPIST OR A CLINICAL MARRIAGE AND FAMILY THERAPIST WITH AN
EQUIVALENT LEVEL OF LICENSURE IN ANY OTHER STATE;
(IV) A MARYLAND–LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL
WORKER–CLINICAL OR A CLINICAL SOCIAL WORKER WITH AN EQUIVALENT LEVEL
OF LICENSURE IN ANY OTHER STATE;
(V) 1. A MARYLAND–LICENSED GRADUATE OR MASTER
SOCIAL WORKER WITH AT LEAST 2 YEARS OF EXPERIENCE IN:
A. ONE OR MORE OF THE AREAS LISTED IN SUBSECTION
(F)(4) OF THIS SECTION;
B. CONDUCTING CUSTODY EVALUATIONS; OR

HOUSE BILL 137 3
C. ANY COMBINATION OF THE EXPERIENCE DESCRIBED
IN ITEM A OR B OF THIS ITEM; OR
2. A GRADUATE OR MASTER SOCIAL WORKER WITH AN
EQUIVALENT LEVEL OF LICENSURE AND EXPERIENCE IN ANY OTHER STATE; OR
(VI) A MARYLAND–LICENSED CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL
COUNSELOR OR A CLINICAL PROFESSIONAL COUNSELOR WITH AN EQUIVALENT
LEVEL OF LICENSURE IN ANY OTHER STATE.
(2) A CUSTODY EVALUATOR SHALL COMPLY WITH ALL CONDITIONS
NECESSARY TO MAINTAIN PROFESSIONAL LICENSURE, INCLUDING COMPLETING
ALL MANDATORY CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS.
(F) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G) OF THIS SECTION, A CUSTODY
EVALUATOR MUST HAVE:
(1) COMPLETED A TRAINING PROGRAM THAT CONFORMS TO
GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED BY THE ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS;
(2) COMPLIED WITH THE CONTINUING EDUCATIONAL
REQUIREMENTS OF THE CUSTODY EVALUATOR’S FIELD;
(3) EXPERIENCE IN CONDUCTING OR OBSERVING CUSTODY
EVALUATIONS; AND
(4) DEMONSTRATED KNOWLEDGE OF AND EXPERIENCE IN THE
FOLLOWING TOPICS:
(I) DOMESTIC AND FAMILY VIOLENCE;
(II) CHILD NEGLECT AND ABUSE, INCLUDING SEXUAL ABUSE;
(III) CHILD AND ADULT DEVELOPMENT;
(IV) TRAUMA AND ITS IMPACT ON CHILDREN AND ADULTS;
(V) FAMILY DYNAMICS AND CONFLICT RESOLUTION;
(VI) DISABILITY–RELATED ISSUES; AND
(VII) THE IMPACT OF DIVORCE AND SEPARATION ON CHILDREN
AND ADULTS.

HOUSE BILL 137
(G) A COURT MAY WAIVE THE REQUIREMENTS IN SUBSECTIONS (E) AND (F)
OF THIS SECTION FOR A COURT EMPLOYEE OR AN INDIVIDUAL UNDER CONTRACT
WITH THE COURT WHO:
(1) CONDUCTED CUSTODY EVALUATIONS FOR AT LEAST 14 YEARS
PRIOR TO JANUARY 1, 2025;
(2) HAS COMPLETED A TRAINING PROGRAM REQUIRED BY
SUBSECTION (F)(1) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(3) COMPLETES AT LEAST 20 HOURS PER YEAR OF CONTINUING
EDUCATION RELEVANT TO CONDUCTING CUSTODY EVALUATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.